Michigan, session 2025-2026, HB5676.
people of the state of michigan enact: Sec. 1. (1) A commission to be known and designated as the "Michigan public service commission" is hereby created, which shall consist The Michigan public service commission is created, and beginning January 1, 2029 is established in the legislative branch. (2) Before January 1, 2029, the commission consists of 3 members, not more than 2 of whom shall be are members of the same political party, appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate. Beginning January 1, 2029, the existing appointed Michigan public service commission is abolished and replaced with a 5-member nonpartisan elected Michigan public service commission as provided in chapter VIA of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.87 to 168.87n. (3) Each member shall of the commission must be a citizen of the United States, and be a resident of the this state, of Michigan, and no member of said commission shall not be pecuniarily interested in any public utility or public service person subject to the jurisdiction and control of the commission. (4) During his a member's term, no a member shall not serve as an officer or committee member of any political party organization, or hold any other office, or be employed by any other commission, board, department, or institution in this state. No commission (5) A member of the commission shall not be retained or employed by any public utility or public service person subject to the jurisdiction and control of the commission during the time he while the member is acting as such commissioner, and a member of the commission and for 6 months thereafter, and no after that time. (6) A member of the commission , who is a member of the bar of the state State Bar of Michigan , shall not practice his profession law or act as counselor or attorney in any court of this state during the time he while the individual is a member of said the commission. : Provided, however, This shall (7) This section does not require any commissioner to retire from , or dissolve any partnership , of which he the individual is a member, but said the partnership , while he is a member of the commission, shall must not engage in public utility practice . Immediately upon the taking effect of this act, the offices of the present members of the Michigan public service commission are hereby abolished, and the members of the Michigan public service commission as herein created shall be appointed by the governor with the advice and consent of the senate, for terms of 6 years each: Provided, That of the members first appointed, 1 shall be appointed for a term of 2 years, 1 for a term of 4 years, and 1 for a term of 6 years. Upon the expiration of said terms successors shall be appointed with like qualifications and in like manner for terms of 6 years each, and until their successors are appointed and qualified. Vacancies shall while the individual is a member of the commission. (8) Before January 1, 2029, vacancies must be filled in the same manner as is provided for appointment in the first instance. Beginning January 1, 2029, vacancies must be filled as provided in section 87l of the Michigan election law, 1954 PA 116, MCL 168.87l. Sec. 2. (1) Members of said the commission shall qualify by taking and subscribing to the constitutional oath of office. , and shall hold office until the appointment and qualification of their successor. The (2) Before January 1, 2029, the governor shall designate 1 member to serve as chairman chairperson of the commission. Any Beginning January 1, 2029, the members of the commission shall select the chairperson of the commission. (3) The legislature may remove any member of the commission may be removed by the governor for misfeasance, malfeasance, or nonfeasance in office after a hearing. (4) A vacancy in the commission shall not impair the right of the 2 remaining members to exercise all the powers of the commission. Two Three members of the commission shall at all times constitute constitutes a quorum. (5) The commission shall adopt an official seal , of which all the courts shall take judicial notice and proceedings, and from which orders and decrees may be authenticated. thereby. It shall be the duty of the (6) The board of state auditors to shall provide suitable offices, supplies, and equipment for said the commission in the city of Lansing. , the The expenses thereof to of the commission must be audited, allowed, and paid in such a manner and out of such from funds as may be provided by law. Sec. 3. The salary of the chairman of the commission and of each of the other members and the schedule for reimbursement of expenses shall be established annually by the legislature. each member of the commission shall be determined by the state officers compensation commission under section 12 of article IV of the state constitution of 1963. The commission may appoint a secretary and the deputies, clerks, assistants, inspectors, heads of divisions, and employees necessary for the proper exercise of the powers and duties of the commission. All salaries and other expenses incurred by the commission shall must be paid out of funds appropriated by the legislature. All fees and other moneys money received by the commission shall must be paid over at the end of each month to the state treasurer. , taking a receipt therefor. The commission may employ engineers and experts in public utilities and public service matters and fix their the compensation for services, which may be paid out of the appropriation provided by the legislature. The engineers, inspectors, and employees shall be are entitled to their actual and necessary expenses incurred in the performance of the work of the commission pursuant to under the schedule established by the legislature. Each deputy, clerk, assistant, engineer, inspector, or expert shall perform the duties required by the commission. Each member of the commission shall devote his the member's entire time to the performance of the duties of his the member's office. Enacting section 1. This amendatory act does not take effect unless House Bill No. 5677 (request no. H05541'25 a) of the 103rd Legislature is enacted into law.